Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Chapter 15. Alaska Product Preferences.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions applicable to state procurements, see AS

36.30.322

—

36.30.338

.

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, §§ 80, 81.

73A C.J.S., Public Contracts, §§ 7-24

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 280-288.

Validity, construction, and effect of state and local laws requiring governmental units to give “purchase preference” to goods manufactured or services performed in state. 84 ALR4th 419.